Wyoming, session 2025, HB0180.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-338 is created to read:

21-13-338. Mental health program for K-12 students.

(a) The department of education shall administer a
program to address the mental health needs of K-12 public
school students. The program shall be implemented in K-12
public schools for a minimum of two (2) school years and
HB0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0450
shall focus on advancing wellness and resiliency in the
education of K-12 students. The intent of the program shall
be to screen or otherwise identify students with mental
health challenges, to stabilize those students until
further support can be found and to refer those students to
appropriate services. Program funding shall be available to
every Wyoming public school district, each of which can
choose whether to implement the program.

(b) Each school district participating in the program
shall report to the department of education the expenditure
of amounts appropriated for this program, the number of
students that received services as a result of the program
and the impact of the services offered. Each district shall
provide other information and data as required by the
department.

(c) Schools shall notify parents or guardians if
their child is identified as needing services under the
program pursuant to the requirements of W.S. 21-3-135.

Section 2.

HB0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0450
(a) Up to five million dollars ($5,000,000.00), or as
much thereof as is credited to the public school foundation
program account as a result of the appropriation repealed
in section 3 is hereby reappropriated from the public
school foundation program account to the department of
education‑school finance in order to implement the mental
health program pursuant to section 1 of this act for school
year 2025-2026, to augment amounts within the education
resource block grant model available to districts to
address the mental health needs of the K-12 student
population. This reappropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2026. This reappropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.

(b) There is appropriated eight hundred five thousand
dollars ($805,000.00) from the public school foundation
program account to the department of education‑school
finance to implement the mental health program pursuant to
section 1 of this act for school year 2025-2026, to augment
HB0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0450
amounts within the education resource block grant model
available to districts to address the mental health needs
of the K-12 student population. This appropriation shall be
for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that the
funding to implement the mental health program in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section be doubled and
included in the department of education‑school finance's
next budget request submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013.

(d) From the reappropriation in subsection (a) of
this section and appropriation in subsection (b) of this
section:

(i) Community project manager positions shall be
created in each participating district, the salaries and
fringe benefits of which shall not exceed one hundred
HB0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0450
thousand dollars ($100,000.00) per school year, per
district with an ADM of five hundred (500) or more students
and which shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000.00) per school year, per district with an ADM of
less than five hundred (500) students;

(ii) Community support coordinator positions
shall be created in each participating district, the
salaries and fringe benefits of which shall not exceed
thirty‑five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) per school year,
per district.

(e) The department of education is authorized two (2)
full-time positions for the purpose of implementing and
administering this act. The salary and benefits of the
positions authorized under this subsection shall be paid
from the reappropriation made in subsection (a) of this
section and the appropriation made in subsection (b) of
this section, in an amount not to exceed two hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000.00) per fiscal year.

Section 3.

HB0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0450
(a) 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section
331(a) is repealed.

(b) Unexpended, unobligated funds deappropriated as a
result of the appropriation repealed in subsection (a) of
this section shall be credited to the public school
foundation program account on the effective date of this
section.

Section 4. Not later than August 1, 2026, the
department of education shall report to the joint education
interim committee findings and recommendations on the
number of students served as a result of the implementation
of the mental health program pursuant to section 1 of this
act and shall include any recommendations to address the
costs associated with responding to students' mental health
needs.

HB0180

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0450
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0180